Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.920

Short title.

This act shall be known as the "Washington Trust Act."

[ 1985 c 30 s 62. Prior: 1959 c 124 s 12. Formerly RCW 30.99.910.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.